Florida, session 2026, HB539.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 162.41, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
162.41 Code inspector body cameras; policies and
procedures.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Body camera" means a portable electronic recording
device that is worn on a code inspector's person and that
records audio and video data of the code inspector's encounters
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 539 2026
and activities.
(b) "Code inspector" has the same meaning as provided in
s. 162.04(2).
(2) A governmental entity that authorizes its code
inspectors to use body cameras must establish policies and
procedures addressing the proper use, maintenance, and storage
of body cameras and the data recorded by body cameras. The
policies and procedures must include:
(a) Any limitations on code inspectors who are allowed to
use body cameras.
(b) Any limitations on code enforcement-related encounters
and activities in which code inspectors are allowed to use body
cameras.
(c) General guidelines for the proper storage, retention,
and release of audio and video data recorded by body cameras.
(3) A governmental entity that authorizes its code
inspectors to use body cameras shall:
(a) Ensure that all code inspectors who use, maintain, or
store body cameras are trained in the governmental entity's body
camera policies and procedures.
(b) Retain audio and video data recorded by body cameras
in accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as
otherwise provided by law.
(c) Perform a periodic review of actual body camera
practices to ensure conformity with the governmental entity's
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 539 2026
body camera policies and procedures.
Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 934.03, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5), subsection (1) is
amended, and subsection (4) is added to that section, to read:
934.03 Interception and disclosure of wire, oral, or
electronic communications prohibited.—
(1) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this
chapter, any person who:
(a) Intentionally intercepts, endeavors to intercept, or
procures any other person to intercept or endeavor to intercept
any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(b) Intentionally uses, endeavors to use, or procures any
other person to use or endeavor to use any electronic,
mechanical, or other device to intercept any oral communication
when:
1. Such device is affixed to, or otherwise transmits a
signal through, a wire, cable, or other like connection used in
wire communication; or
2. Such device transmits communications by radio or
interferes with the transmission of such communication;
(c) Intentionally discloses, or endeavors to disclose, to
any other person the contents of any wire, oral, or electronic
communication, knowing or having reason to know that the
information was obtained through the interception of a wire,
oral, or electronic communication in violation of this
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 539 2026
subsection;
(d) Intentionally uses, or endeavors to use, the contents
of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or
having reason to know that the information was obtained through
the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in
violation of this subsection; or
(e) Intentionally discloses, or endeavors to disclose, to
any other person the contents of any wire, oral, or electronic
communication intercepted by means authorized by subparagraph
(2)(a)2., paragraph (2)(b), paragraph (2)(c), s. 934.07, or s.
934.09 when that person knows or has reason to know that the
information was obtained through the interception of such a
communication in connection with a criminal investigation, has
obtained or received the information in connection with a
criminal investigation, and intends to improperly obstruct,
impede, or interfere with a duly authorized criminal
investigation;

shall be punished as provided in subsection (5) (4).
(4) It is lawful under this section and ss. 934.04–934.09
for a code inspector, as defined in 162.04(2), or a person
acting under the direction of a special magistrate or code
enforcement board to intercept a wire, oral, or electronic
communication if such code inspector or person is a party to the
100 communication or one of the parties to the communication has
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 539 2026
101 given prior consent to such interception and the purpose of such
102 interception is to obtain evidence of a violation of a code, an
103 ordinance, or a general law.
104 Section 3. Subsection (7) of section 934.09, Florida
105 Statutes, is amended to read:
106 934.09 Procedure for interception of wire, oral, or
107 electronic communications.—
108 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
109 any investigative or law enforcement officer specially
110 designated by the Governor, the Attorney General, the statewide
111 prosecutor, or a state attorney acting under this chapter, who
112 reasonably determines that:
113 (a) An emergency exists that:
114 1. Involves immediate danger of death or serious physical
115 injury to any person, the danger of escape of a prisoner, or
116 conspiratorial activities threatening the security interest of
117 the nation or state; and
118 2. Requires that a wire, oral, or electronic communication
119 be intercepted before an order authorizing such interception
120 can, with due diligence, be obtained; and
121 (b) There are grounds upon which an order could be entered
122 under this chapter to authorize such interception
123
124 may intercept such wire, oral, or electronic communication if an
125 application for an order approving the interception is made in
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb539-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 539 2026
126 accordance with this section within 48 hours after the
127 interception has occurred or begins to occur. In the absence of
128 an order, such interception shall immediately terminate when the
129 communication sought is obtained or when the application for the
130 order is denied, whichever is earlier. If such application for
131 approval is denied, or in any other case in which the
132 interception is terminated without an order having been issued,
133 the contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication
134 intercepted shall be treated as having been obtained in
135 violation of s. 934.03(5) s. 934.03(4), and an inventory shall
136 be served as provided for in paragraph (8)(e) on the person
137 named in the application.
138 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb539-00